Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6758XC (2) 91 mb/md S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256C.3, subsection 3, paragraph f, Code 1 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 2 lieu thereof the following: 3 f. (1) The following minimum hours per week of instruction, 4 as chosen by the school district at the beginning of the school 5 year, delivered on the skills and knowledge included in the 6 student learning standards developed for the preschool program: 7 (a) For the school year beginning July 1, 2026, either of 8 the following: 9 (i) Ten hours per week of instruction for each student. 10 (ii) (A) Ten hours per week of instruction for students not 11 described in subparagraph part (B). 12 (B) For eligible students whose household income is less 13 than one hundred eighty-five percent of the federal poverty 14 level applicable to the familyâs size, fifteen hours per week 15 of instruction. 16 (b) For school years beginning on or after July 1, 2027, 17 either of the following: 18 (i) Ten hours per week of instruction for each student. 19 (ii) (A) Ten hours per week of instruction for students not 20 described in subparagraph part (B). 21 (B) For eligible students whose household income is less 22 than one hundred eighty-five percent of the federal poverty 23 level applicable to the familyâs size, twenty hours per week 24 of instruction. 25 (2) If a school district chooses to satisfy the minimum 26 hour requirements for a school year under subparagraph (1), 27 subparagraph division (a), subparagraph subdivision (ii), 28 families of eligible children whose household income is less 29 than one hundred eighty-five percent of the federal poverty 30 level applicable to the familyâs size may choose between ten 31 hours of instruction per week or fifteen hours of instruction 32 per week. 33 (3) If a school district chooses to satisfy the minimum 34 hour requirements for a school year under subparagraph (1), 35 -1- LSB 6758XC (2) 91 mb/md 1/ 4 S.F. _____ subparagraph division (b), subparagraph subdivision (ii), 1 families of eligible children whose household income is less 2 than one hundred eighty-five percent of the federal poverty 3 level applicable to the familyâs size may choose between ten 4 hours of instruction per week or twenty hours of instruction 5 per week. 6 Sec. 2. Section 256C.5, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 7 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 8 lieu thereof the following: 9 c. âPreschool budget enrollmentâ means either of the 10 following figures as applicable to the school district based on 11 the numbers of eligible students approved to participate and 12 enrolled in the preschool programming provided by the school 13 district on October 1 of the base year, or the first Monday in 14 October if October 1 falls on a Saturday or Sunday: 15 (1) For a school district providing minimum required school 16 hours as set under section 256C.3, subsection 3, paragraph 17 âfâ , subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (a), subparagraph 18 subdivision (i), or section 256C.3, subsection 3, paragraph 19 âfâ , subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (b), subparagraph 20 subdivision (i), fifty percent of the actual enrollment of 21 eligible students. 22 (2) For a school district providing minimum required school 23 hours as set under section 256C.3, subsection 3, paragraph 24 âfâ , subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (a), subparagraph 25 subdivision (ii), the sum of all of the following: 26 (a) Fifty percent of the actual enrollment of eligible 27 students not described in subparagraph division (b). 28 (b) Seventy-five percent of the actual enrollment of 29 eligible students who receive a minimum of fifteen hours of 30 instruction per week and whose household income is less than 31 one hundred eighty-five percent of the federal poverty level 32 applicable to the familyâs size. 33 (3) For a school district providing minimum required school 34 hours as set under section 256C.3, subsection 3, paragraph 35 -2- LSB 6758XC (2) 91 mb/md 2/ 4 S.F. _____ âfâ , subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (b), subparagraph 1 subdivision (ii), the sum of all of the following: 2 (a) Fifty percent of the actual enrollment of eligible 3 students not described in subparagraph division (b). 4 (b) The actual enrollment of eligible students who receive 5 a minimum of twenty hours of instruction per week and whose 6 household income is less than one hundred eighty-five percent 7 of the federal poverty level applicable to the familyâs size. 8